Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB826.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2 of the act of October 24, 2018 (P.L.719, No.112), known as the Patient Test Result Information Act, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Clinical laboratory." As defined in section 2 of the act of September 26, 1951 (P.L.1539, No.389), known as The Clinical Laboratory Act.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:1234567891011121314151617181920 Section 3.1. Lyme disease testing disclosure.(a) Notice to health care practitioner.--When a clinical laboratory is reporting a Lyme disease test result ordered by a health care practitioner, the clinical laboratory shall provide notice to the health care practitioner, which shall include, at minimum, the following disclosure:Patients undergoing a Lyme disease test should be aware that Lyme disease tests vary and may produce results that are not accurate. This means a patient may not be able to rely on a positive or negative test. If you continue to experience symptoms, you should contact your health care provider and inquire about the appropriateness of retesting and the applicability for pursuing additional or alternative treatment options.(b) Notice to patient required.--A health care practitioner receiving a notice under subsection (a) shall provide the notice to the patient who is the subject of the Lyme disease test result at the time the health care practitioner provides the patient the test results from the clinical laboratory.(c) Existing medical professional duty and obligation.--Nothing in this act shall be construed as relieving a health care practitioner from complying with an existing professional obligation to inform a patient of test results.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0826PN0883 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324